Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Interested party” means an  individual or entity with a right to property that may
be affected by a change of name pursuant to this section.
(b) “Offensive” means insulting and derogatory to any of Oregon’s  nine federally recog-
nized Indian tribes or to any race, nationality or ethnicity.
(2) The executive secretary of the Oregon Geographic Names Board shall:
(a) Compile a list of geographic  features including, but not limited to, mountains, buttes,
gulleys, gulches, rivers and creeks in Oregon that bear offensive names; and
(b) Begin a process of determining new names for the geographic features.
(3)(a) In fulfilling the duties imposed under subsection (2)  of this section, the executive
secretary shall consult with:
(A) The Oregon Geographic Names Board;
(B) Oregon’s nine federally recognized Indian tribes;
(C) County and municipal leaders;
(D) Representatives of state government;
(E) Local landowners; and
(F) Interested parties.
(b) Leaders and representatives shall be consulted only with respect  to geographic fea-
tures within the jurisdictions they represent.
(4)(a) The executive secretary shall provide the following items to the persons listed  in
paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) The list compiled under subsection (2)(a) of this section;
(B) A summary of the process by which geographic features are named; and
(C) Detailed instructions on how  Oregonians may propose a name for a geographic fea-
ture.
(b) The persons referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection are:
(A) All members of the Legislative Assembly on the date on which the list is provided;
(B) Oregon’s nine federally recognized Indian tribes;
(C) All members of the governing bodies of all  Oregon counties on the date on which the
list is provided; and
Enrolled House Bill 3532 (HB 3532-B) Page 1
(D) All county historical societies in this state.
(5) The executive secretary shall submit proposals to the  U.S. Board on Geographic
Names recommending names that are not offensive for all geographic features on the  list
compiled under subsection (2)(a) of this section no later than the date  that is three years
following the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 3. (1) The executive secretary  of the Oregon Geographic Names Board shall
submit a report, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the progress made in fulfilling
the duties imposed under section 1 of this 2025 Act, to the interim committees of the Legis-
lative Assembly related to history, no later than February 1, 2026.
(2) The executive secretary shall provide the list  as required under section 1 (4) of this
2025 Act no later than August 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House May 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3532 (HB 3532-B) Page 2